Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.404, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Cities. (a) A city may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to the following establishments located within its jurisdiction: (1) hotels; (2) restaurants; (3) bowling centers; (4) clubs or congressionally chartered veterans organizations with the approval of the commissioner, provided that the organization has been in existence for at least three years and liquor sales will only be to members and bona fide guests, except that a club may permit the general public to participate in a wine tasting conducted at the club under section 340A.419; (5) sports facilities, restaurants, clubs, or bars located on land owned or leased by the Minnesota Sports Facilities Authority; (6) sports facilities located on land owned by the Metropolitan Sports Commission; (7) exclusive liquor stores; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (8) resorts as defined in section 157.15, subdivision 11deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (9) a cosmetology salon under section 155A.29. new text end (b) A city may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license, an on-sale wine license, or an on-sale malt liquor license to a theater within the city, notwithstanding any law, local ordinance, or charter provision. A license issued under this paragraph authorizes sales on all days of the week to persons attending events at the theater. (c) A city may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license, an on-sale wine license, or an on-sale malt liquor license to a convention center within the city, notwithstanding any law, local ordinance, or charter provision. A license issued under this paragraph authorizes sales on all days of the week to persons attending events at the convention center. This paragraph does not apply to convention centers located in the seven-county metropolitan area. (d) A municipality may issue an on-sale wine license and an on-sale malt liquor license to a person who is the owner of a summer collegiate league baseball team or baseball team competing in a league established by the Minnesota Baseball Association, or to a person holding a concessions or management contract with the owner, for beverage sales at a ballpark or stadium located within the municipality for the purposes of summer collegiate league baseball games, town ball games, and any other events at the ballpark or stadium, notwithstanding any law, local ordinance, or charter provision. A license issued under this paragraph authorizes sales on all days of the week to persons attending baseball games and any other events at the ballpark or stadium. (e) A municipality may issue an on-sale malt liquor license to a resort as defined in section 157.15, subdivision 11, notwithstanding any law, local ordinance, or charter provision. A license issued under this paragraph authorizes sales on all days of the week to persons staying at the resort and their guests. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end